SpellChecking/Dictionaries/gikuyu.aff
FLAG num
PFX 111 e rũtigĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtigĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rũtigĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o rũtigĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rũtigĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatikĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gatikĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gatikĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatikĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gatikĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatikĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatigĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gatigĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gatigĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatigĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gatigĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatigĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtikĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gũtikĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtikĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtikĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtikĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtikĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtigĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtigĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtigĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtigĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtigĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtigĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatikĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e hatikĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e hatikĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatikĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o hatikĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatikĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatigĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e hatigĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e hatigĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatigĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o hatigĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatigĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ndingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ndingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ndingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ndingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ndingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ndingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 itangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e itangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o itangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 itangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o itangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 tũtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e tũtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ tũtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o tũtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ tũtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 tũtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ tũtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o tũtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ tũtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 tũtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e tũtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ tũtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o tũtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ tũtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 tũtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e tũtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ tũtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o tũtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ tũtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndũngĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ndũngĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ndũngĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndũngĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ndũngĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndũngĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndũngĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ndũngĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ndũngĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndũngĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ndũngĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndũngĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ũtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ũtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ũtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ũtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ũtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ũtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ũtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ũtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ũtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ũtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ũtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ũtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 mũtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e mũtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ mũtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o mũtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ mũtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 mũtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ mũtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o mũtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ mũtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 mũtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e mũtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ mũtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o mũtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ mũtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 mũtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e mũtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ mũtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o mũtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ mũtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ndangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ndangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ndangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ndangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ndangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ndangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 atangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e atangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e atangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ atangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o atangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ atangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 atangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e atangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e atangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ atangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o atangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ atangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 matingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e matingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e matingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ matingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o matingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ matingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 matingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e matingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e matingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ matingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o matingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ matingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 matangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e matangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e matangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ matangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o matangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ matangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 matangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e matangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e matangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ matangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o matangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ matangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndĩngĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ndĩngĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ndĩngĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndĩngĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ndĩngĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndĩngĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ndĩngĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ndĩngĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ndĩngĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ndĩngĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ndĩngĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ndĩngĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ĩtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e ĩtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e ĩtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ĩtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o ĩtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ĩtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 ĩtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e ĩtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e ĩtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ ĩtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o ĩtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ ĩtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 rĩtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e rĩtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rĩtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o rĩtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rĩtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 rĩtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rĩtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o rĩtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rĩtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 rĩtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e rĩtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rĩtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o rĩtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rĩtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 rĩtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e rĩtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rĩtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o rĩtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rĩtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gĩtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gĩtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gĩtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gĩtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gĩtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gĩtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gĩtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gĩtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gĩtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gĩtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gĩtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gĩtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gĩtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gĩtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gĩtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gĩtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gĩtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gĩtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gĩtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 itingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e itingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e itingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o itingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 itingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e itingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e itingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o itingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 itangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e itangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o itangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 itangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e itangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ itangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o itangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ itangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 citingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e citingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e citingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ citingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o citingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ citingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 citingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e citingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e citingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ citingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o citingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ citingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 citangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e citangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e citangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ citangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o citangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ citangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 citangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e citangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e citangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ citangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o citangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ citangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 rũtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e rũtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rũtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o rũtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rũtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 rũtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rũtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o rũtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rũtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 rũtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e rũtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rũtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o rũtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rũtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 rũtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e rũtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ rũtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o rũtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ rũtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gatingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gatingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gatingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gatingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gatingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gatingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gatangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gatangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gatangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gatangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gatangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gatangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gatangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gatangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gatangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gũtingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e gũtangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 gũtangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e gũtangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ gũtangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o gũtangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ gũtangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatingĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e hatingĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e hatingĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatingĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o hatingĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatingĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatingĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e hatingĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e hatingĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatingĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o hatingĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatingĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatangĩkĩ [bghmnr]
PFX 111 e hatangĩkĩa a[^ckt]
PFX 111 e hatangĩkĩe e[^ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatangĩkĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 111 o hatangĩkĩo o[^ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatangĩkĩũ ũ[^ckt]
PFX 111 0 hatangĩgĩ [ckt]
PFX 111 e hatangĩgĩa a[ckt]
PFX 111 e hatangĩgĩe e[ckt]
PFX 111 ĩ hatangĩgĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 111 o hatangĩgĩo o[ckt]
PFX 111 ũ hatangĩgĩũ ũ[ckt]
PFX 111 0 ngaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e ngahe e
PFX 111 ĩ ngahe ĩ
PFX 111 o ngaho o
PFX 111 ũ ngaho ũ
PFX 111 0 ngaaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e ngaahe  e
PFX 111 ĩ ngaahe  ĩ
PFX 111 o ngaaho  o
PFX 111 ũ ngaaho  ũ
PFX 111 0 tũkaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e tũkahe e
PFX 111 ĩ tũkahe ĩ
PFX 111 o tũkaho o
PFX 111 ũ tũkaho ũ
PFX 111 0 tũkaaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e tũkaahe  e
PFX 111 ĩ tũkaahe  ĩ
PFX 111 o tũkaaho  o
PFX 111 ũ tũkaaho  ũ
PFX 111 0 ũkaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e ũkahe e
PFX 111 ĩ ũkahe ĩ
PFX 111 o ũkaho o
PFX 111 ũ ũkaho ũ
PFX 111 0 ũkaaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e ũkaahe  e
PFX 111 ĩ ũkaahe  ĩ
PFX 111 o ũkaaho  o
PFX 111 ũ ũkaaho  ũ
PFX 111 0 mũkaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e mũkahe e
PFX 111 ĩ mũkahe ĩ
PFX 111 o mũkaho o
PFX 111 ũ mũkaho ũ
PFX 111 0 mũkaaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e mũkaahe  e
PFX 111 ĩ mũkaahe  ĩ
PFX 111 o mũkaaho  o
PFX 111 ũ mũkaaho  ũ
PFX 111 0 akaha [^eĩoũ]
PFX 111 e akahe e
PFX 111 ĩ akahe ĩ
PFX 111 o akaho o
PFX 111 ũ akaho ũ
PFX 111 0 akaaha [^eĩoũ]
